n11.dix
<pardef n="sarvAMwaryAmi/_n">
        <e><p>
                <l>yu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>yannu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYannu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>yiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>geV</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>gAgi</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>goskara</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYigeV</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>galYigAgi</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>galYigoskara</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ya deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>lYa deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ya</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yalli</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYalli</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>		
        <e><p>
                <l>ye</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYe</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kitaki/_n">
        <e><p>
                <l>yu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>yannu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYannu</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>yiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>geV</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>gAgi</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>goskara</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYigeV</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>galYigAgi</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>		
		<e><p>
				<l>galYigoskara</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ya deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYa deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ya</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYa</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>yalli</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>galYalli</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>		
        <e><p>
                <l>yeV</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>galYeV</l>
                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="sarvAMwaryAmi"><i>sarvAMwaryAmi</i><par n="sarvAMwaryAmi/_n"/></e>
<e lm="sukanAsi"><i>sukanAsi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="aggi"><i>aggi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="aByarWi"><i>aByarWi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="vyakwi"><i>vyakwi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="aMgi"><i>aMgi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="aleVmAri"><i>aleVmAri</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="apaXamani"><i>apaXamani</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="Anu"><i>Anu</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="isabu"><i>isabu</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="eVradu"><i>eVradu</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="asWi"><i>asWi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="ABAri"><i>ABAri</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="Aswi"><i>Aswi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="ilYi"><i>ilYi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="udi"><i>udi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="uri"><i>uri</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="UsaravalYlYi"><i>UsaravalYlYi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="biccunudi"><i>biccunudi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="birunudi"><i>birunudi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="buguri"><i>buguri</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="bqhaspawi"><i>bqhaspawi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="bekAbitti"><i>bekAbitti</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="boVddi"><i>boVddi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="BaMgi"><i>BaMgi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="Barci"><i>Barci</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="BApuri"><i>BApuri</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="Bexi"><i>Bexi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="maMjUrAwi"><i>maMjUrAwi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="maccaraxAni"><i>maccaraxAni</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="maxaraMgi"><i>maxaraMgi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="marujevaNi"><i>marujevaNi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="maswi"><i>maswi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="mAxari"><i>mAxari</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="miMdi"><i>miMdi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="muMgolYi"><i>muMgolYi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="muKyamaMwri"><i>muKyamaMwri</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="munsi"><i>munsi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="musuMdi"><i>musuMdi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="mUlavyAXi"><i>mUlavyAXi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="moci"><i>moci</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="raMgavalli"><i>raMgavalli</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="rahaNi"><i>rahaNi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="rARtrapakRi"><i>rARtrapakRi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="lajjeVgedi"><i>lajjeVgedi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="lUti"><i>lUti</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="vajramuRti"><i>vajramuRti</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="vAxakki"><i>vAxakki</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="vijFAni"><i>vijFAni</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="virawi"><i>virawi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="vqRti"><i>vqRti</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="SaraNArWi"><i>SaraNArWi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="SEli"><i>SEli</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="saMXivigrahi"><i>saMXivigrahi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="sanAxi"><i>sanAxi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="samiwi"><i>samiwi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="saluvalYi"><i>saluvalYi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="sahoxyogi"><i>sahoxyogi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="siMbi"><i>siMbi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="suMdili"><i>suMdili</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="sUkRmaxqRti"><i>sUkRmaxqRti</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="soMberi"><i>soMberi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="svargavAsi"><i>svargavAsi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="haTavAxi"><i>haTavAxi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="hariNi"><i>hariNi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="hAxi"><i>hAxi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="hiMxi"><i>hiMxi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="huttuvalYi"><i>huttuvalYi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="hUvali"><i>hUvali</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="hoVralYi"><i>hoVralYi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="oVdanAdi"><i>oVdanAdi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="kaceri"><i>kaceri</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="kannadi"><i>kannadi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="kasAyi"><i>kasAyi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="kApAli"><i>kApAli</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="kiccadi"><i>kiccadi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="kuMtaNi"><i>kuMtaNi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="kuyukwi"><i>kuyukwi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="kExi"><i>kExi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="koTi"><i>koTi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="KaMdi"><i>KaMdi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="gaMji"><i>gaMji</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="galli"><i>galli</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="giraNi"><i>giraNi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="gubbacci"><i>gubbacci</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="goVtti"><i>goVtti</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="Gatti"><i>Gatti</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="cappadi"><i>cappadi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="cAvati"><i>cAvati</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="cilipili"><i>cilipili</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="coli"><i>coli</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="jagawi"><i>jagawi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="javAri"><i>javAri</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="jedi"><i>jedi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="tippaNi"><i>tippaNi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="waMwri"><i>waMwri</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="waragawi"><i>waragawi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="wixi"><i>wixi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="wurAyi"><i>wurAyi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="woVtti"><i>woVtti</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="xaNi"><i>xaNi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="xAMgudi"><i>xAMgudi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="ximmi"><i>ximmi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="xUraxqRti"><i>xUraxqRti</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="xrAkRi"><i>xrAkRi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="nattadavi"><i>nattadavi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="nAdAdi"><i>nAdAdi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="nivqwwi"><i>nivqwwi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="neVravi"><i>neVravi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="pacci"><i>pacci</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="pariXi"><i>pariXi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="pApAsukalYlYi"><i>pApAsukalYlYi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="pilYlYaMgovi"><i>pilYlYaMgovi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="puravaNi"><i>puravaNi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="pOlYi"><i>pOlYi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="praBAvalYi"><i>praBAvalYi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="baMdi"><i>baMdi</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="baweri"><i>baweri</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="bAji"><i>bAji</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
<e lm="SAswri"><i>SAswri</i><par n="kitaki/_n"/></e>
